District of Columbia statutes.
50-2002

Approval of courses; certificate of completion.

(a)

The Department of Transportation shall establish criteria and guidelines for the approval of motor vehicle accident prevention courses (“course”) for individuals 50 years of age and older.

(b)

An approved classroom course shall require that each student receives a minimum of 6 hours of instruction for the initial course and 4 hours of instruction for the renewal courses.

(b-1)

An approved online course shall require that each student receives validation of instruction that is equal to or greater than that offered in a classroom course.

(c)

An individual who successfully completes an approved course shall be issued a certificate of completion by the organization operating the course.

Feb. 9, 1984, D.C. Law 5-46, §§ 3, 4, 30 DCR 5638
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-51, § 2(b), 60 DCR 15155
This section is referenced in § 50-2003.
1981 Ed., § 40-492.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-51 substituted “50 years of age” for “55 years of age” in (a); rewrote (b), which read: “An approved course shall provide not less than 8 hours of actual classroom or field driving instruction”; and added (b-1).